dictionaries/pt_BR/hyph_pt_BR.dic
ISO8859-1
.a3p4o6i5a
.a3p4o6i5o
.csi1
.e1o2m5b4
.é3n2
.g6n4o
.hsi1
.hú1b
.hú2n3
.hú2s3
.hú3m
.p4s2a3
.p4s2á3
.p4s2â3
.p4s2e1
.p4s2é1
.p4s2i3
.p4s2o3
.p4s2ó3
.p6a1l4e3o2n5
.p6a5l4e3o1
.p6a5l4e3o1i2c3
.p6s2e4u3
.s2i3m2õ
.s2o4f6t3
.s2u4b3l2i5m2i3n2
.s2u4b3l2i5n4h2
.s2u4b3l2o5
.s2u4b3m2
.s2u4b3n2
.s2u4b3p2
.s2u4b3s2e1
.s2u4b3s2i1
.s2u4b3s2í1
.s2u4b3s4e6r1
.s2u4b3s4i6s1
.s2u4b4s3c2
.s2u4b4s3t2
.s2u4b5r2
.t2é3n4u2e
.thúr3
.x2é3n2
.yer1
13ú
1b2a
1b2á
1b2ã
1b2e
1b2é
1b2ê
1b2e4m.
1b2e4n6s.
1b2i
1b2í
1b2l4
1b2o
1b2ô
1b2u
1b2ú
1b4r2
1ba3ó
1bõe3z
1bões
1c2a
1c2á
1c2ã
1c2e
1c2é
1c2ê
1c2e4m.
1c2e4n6s.
1c2hú
1c2húm
1c2i
1c2í
1c2ó
1c2ô
1c2u
1c2ú
1c4h2
1c4l2
1c4r2
1ca3ó
1co3a
1co3á
1co3ã
1co3b
1có3b
1co3c
1có3c
1co3d
1có3d
1co3e
1co3é
1co3ê
1co3f
1có3f
1co3g
1có3g
1co3h
1co3í5
1co3i5b2
1co3i5g2
1co3i5n4h2
1co3ia
1co3im5
1co3in5c4h2
1co3in5ci
1co3in5d2
1co3in5q4
1co3in5t2
1co3ins5
1co3j
1co3l4h2
1co3la
1co3lá
1co3lâ
1co3lã
1có3la
1co3le
1co3lé
1co3lê
1có3le
1co3li
1co3lí
1có3li
1co3lo
1co3ló
1co3lô
1có3lo
1co3lõ2
1co3lu
1co3lú
1có3lu
1co3ma
1co3má
1co3mâ
1co3mã
1cô3ma
1co3me
1co3mé
1co3mê
1cô3me
1co3mi
1co3mí
1cô3mi
1co3mo
1co3mó
1co3mô
1cô3mo
1co3mu
1co3mú
1co3na
1co3ná
1cô3na
1co3nã2
1co3ne
1co3né
1co3nê
1cô3ne
1co3nh2
1co3ni
1co3ní
1cô3ni
1co3no
1co3nó
1co3nô
1cô3no
1co3nu
1co3nú
1cô3nu
1co3o
1co3ó5l
1co3óis.
1co3p2neu3
1co3pa
1co3pá
1có3pa
1co3pe
1co3pé
1co3pê
1có3pe
1co3pi
1co3pí
1có3pi
1co3pl2
1co3po
1co3pó
1co3põ
1có3po
1co3pr2
1có3pr2
1co3pu
1co3pú
1có3pu
1co3q4
1có3q4
1co3ra
1co3rá
1co3râ
1co3rã
1có3ra
1co3ré
1co3rê
1có3re
1co3ri
1co3rí
1có3ri
1co3ro
1co3ró
1co3rô
1có3ro
1co3ru
1co3sa
1co3sá
1co3sâ
1co3sã
1co3se
1co3sé
1co3sê
1có3se
1co3si
1co3sí
1có3si
1co3so
1co3só
1co3su
1co3sú
1co3ta
1co3tá
1co3tã
1có3ta
1co3te
1co3té
1co3tê
1có3te
1co3ti
1co3tí
1có3ti
1co3tl2
1co3to
1co3tó
1co3tô
1có3to
1co3tr2
1có3tr2
1co3tu
1co3tú
1có3tu
1co3v2
1có3v2
1co3w
1co3x2
1có3x2
1co3z2
1cõ4
1cões.
1cói
1coi3c2
1coi3d2
1coi3e
1coi3é
1coi3f2
1coi3l2
1coi3na
1coi3no
1coi3o
1coi3ó
1coi3p2
1coi3q4
1coi3r2
1coi3s2
1coi3t
1coi3v
1col3b
1cól3b2
1col3c
1cól3c2
1col3d2
1col3f2
1col3g2
1col3l
1col3m2
1col3n2
1cól3n2
1col3p2
1cól3p2
1col3q4
1cól3q4
1col3s2
1col3t2
1col3v2
1col3z2
1com3b2
1côm3b2
1com3p2
1côm3p2
1côn2so
1con3c2
1côn3c2
1con3d2
1côn3d2
1con3f2
1côn3f2
1con3g2
1côn3g2
1con3j2
1côn3j2
1con3l2
1con3n2
1con3q4
1côn3q4
1con3r2
1con3sa
1con3se
1con3si
1con3sí
1côn3si
1con3so
1con3su
1con3sú
1côn3su
1con3t2
1côn3t2
1con3v2
1côn3v2
1cons3c2
1côns3c2
1cons3p2
1cons3t2
1cop3s2
1cóp3s2
1cop3t2
1cóp3t2
1cor3b2
1cór3b2
1cor3c2
1cór3c2
1cor3d2
1cór3d2
1cor3f2
1cor3g2
1cor3j2
1cor3l2
1cor3m2
1cór3m2
1cor3n2
1cór3n2
1cor3p2
1cór3p2
1cor3q4
1cór3r2
1cor3s2
1cór3s2
1cor3t2
1cór3t2
1cór3v2
1cor3x2
1cor3z2
1cor5r2
1core
1cos3c2
1cós3c2
1cos3f2
1cos3l2
1cos3m2
1cós3m2
1cos3p2
1cós3p2
1cos3q4
1cós3q4
1cos3s2
1cós3s2
1cos3t2
1cós3t2
1cot3m2
1cot3p2
1cot3t2
1cou3
1d2a
1d2á
1d2ã
1d2e
1d2é
1d2ê
1d2e4m.
1d2e4n6s.
1d2i
1d2í
1d2o
1d2ó
1d2ô
1d2u
1d2ú
1d4r2
1da3ó
1dõe3z
1dões
1f2a
1f2á
1f2ã
1f2e
1f2é
1f2ê
1f2e4m.
1f2e4n6s.
1f2i
1f2í
1f2o
1f2ó
1f2ô
1f2u
1f2ú
1f4l2
1f4r2
1g2a
1g2á
1g2ã
1g2e
1g2é
1g2ê
1g2e4m.
1g2e4n6s.
1g2i
1g2í
1g2o
1g2ó
1g2ô
1g2õ4
1g2u
1g4l2
1g4r2
1j2a
1j2á
1j2ã
1j2e
1j2é
1j2ê
1j2i
1j2o
1j2ó
1j2u
1j4õ2
1jút3
1l2ó
1l2o3w1
1l2ú
1l4h2
1lões.
1ly
1m2a
1m2á
1m2ã
1m2e
1m2é
1m2ê
1m2i
1m2í
1m2o
1m2ó
1m2ô
1m2u
1m2ú
1mõe3z
1mões
1n2a
1n2á
1n2ã
1n2e
1n2é
1n2ê
1n2i
1n2í
1n2o
1n2ó
1n2ô
1n2u
1n3ú
1n4h2
1no3w
1p2a
1p2á
1p2ã
1p2e
1p2é
1p2ê
1p2i
1p2í
1p2o
1p2ó
1p2ô
1p2u
1p2ú
1p4l2
1p4r2
1pa3ó
1pneu
1q4u2
1q4ú2
1r2á
1r2a3ó
1r2ó
1r2u
1s2á
1s2ã
1s2e
1s2é
1s2ê
1s2i
1s2o
1s2ó
1s2ô
1s2u
1s2ú
1s2u4b4s3t2
1t2a
1t2á
1t2ã
1t2e
1t2é
1t2ê
1t2i
1t2í
1t2l4
1t2o
1t2ó
1t2ô
1t2õ4
1t2u
1t2ú
1t3n2
1t4h2
1t4r2
1to3w
1v2a
1v2á
1v2ã
1v2e
1v2é
1v2ê
1v2i
1v2í
1v2o
1v2ó
1v2ô
1v2u
1v4r2
1võe3z
1vões
1x2a
1x2á
1x2ã
1x2e
1x2é
1x2ê
1x2i
1x2í
1x2o
1x2ó
1x2ô
1x2u
1ye
1z2a
1z2á
1z2ã
1z2e
1z2é
1z2ê
1z2i
1z2o
1z2ó
1z2ô
1z2u
2a1e3n2a
2a1e3n2ã
2a1e3n2í
2a1e3n2i4g5m
2a1e3n2o
2a1e3n2o3d
2a1e3n2o4i5
2a1e3n2o4s5
2a1e5n2ó3g
2a1yo3
2a3e4n5g
2a3e4n5j
2a3e4n5s
2a3e4n5t
2a3ya
2a4y1en3
2a4y1i3t
2a4y1n
2a4y3i1
2a4y3l
2a4y3r
2a4ye3s
2a4yer
2ãs.
2b1g2
2b1s2a
2b1s2ã
2b1s2e
2b1s2é
2b1s2ê
2b1s2i
2b1s2í
2b1s2o
2b1s2ô
2b1s2u
2b1s2ú
2b1v2
2b3c4
2b3d4
2b3j4
2b3m4
2b3n4
2b3p4
2b3t4
2b4s1b2
2b4s1c2
2b4s1s2
2b4s1t2
2c1s2
2c3c4
2c3f
2c3m4
2c3n4
2c3t4
2d1d2
2d1g2
2d1t2
2d3j4
2d3m4
2d3n4
2d3s4
2d3v4
2é3n3i
2é4n2s
2e4o.
2e4os.
2f1n2
2f3f4
2f3t4
2g1g2
2g1n2
2g1t2
2g3b4
2g3d4
2g3m4
2g3s2
2h1s
2i1é3n2o
2i3õ4
2l3b4
2l3c4
2l3d4
2l3f4
2l3g4
2l3l4
2l3m4
2l3n4
2l3p4
2l3q4
2l3r4
2l3s4
2l3t4
2l3v4
2l3z4
2m1m2
2m3n4
2m3p4
2m4s1
2m5b4
2n3b4
2n3c42
2n3d2
2n3f4
2n3g4
2n3j4
2n3l4
2n3n4
2n3q4
2n3r4
2n3t2
2n3v4
2n3x2
2n3z2a
2n3z2á
2n3z2â
2n3z2ã
2n3z2e
2n3z2é
2n3z2ê
2n3z2i
2n3z2í
2n3z2o
2n3z2ó
2n3z2ô
2n3z2u
2n4s.
2n4z3b2
2n4z3f2
2n4z3m
2n4z3n
2n4z3q4
2n4z3t
2o1i4z.
2ôs.
2p1na
2p1ná
2p1ne
2p1né
2p1nê
2p1ne3n
2p1nea
2p1nei
2p1neo
2p1neó
2p1neô
2p1nes
2p1ni
2p1ní
2p1no
2p1nó
2p1nô
2p1p2
2p3c4
2p3t4
2p4s.
2r3b4
2r3d4
2r3f4
2r3g4
2r3j4
2r3l4
2r3m4
2r3n4
2r3p4
2r3q4
2r3t4
2r3v4
2r3z4
2r5c4
2s3b4
2s3d4
2s3f4
2s3g4
2s3l4
2s3m4
2s3n4
2s3p4
2s3q4
2s3r4
2s5c4
2t3c4
2t3g2
2t3m4
2t3s4
2t3t4
2t3z
2u1ó3
2x3c4
2x3p4
2x3t4
2z1z2
3a2e1é
3co.
3cos.
3n4h2é2n4s
4'4
4e1o2n3c
4e1o2n3d
4e1o2n3f
4e1o2n3t
4e1o2u.
4e1o2u3
4e1o3a2
4e1o3á2
4e1o3â2
4e1o3b2
4e1o3c2
4e1o3d2
4e1o3e
4e1o3f2
4e1o3g2
4e1o3i5a
4e1o3n2a
4e1o3n2á
4e1o3n2â
4e1o3n2e
4e1o3n2é
4e1o3n2ê
4e1o3n2i
4e1o3n2í
4e1o3n2o
4e1o3n2ó
4e1o3n2ô
4e1o3n2u
4e1o3r2a
4e1o3r2â
4e1o3r2é
4e1o3r2ê
4e1o3r2i
4e1o3r2í
4e1o3r2o
4e1o3r2ó
4e1o3r2ô
4e1o3s2a
4e1o3s2â
4e1o3s2e
4e1o3s2i
4e1o3s2í
4e1o3s2o
4e1o3s2ó
4e1o3t2
4e1o3v2
4e1o3x2
4e1o3z2
4e1oi3c2
4e3o2n2h
4h2ow
4l.
4m.
4n3s2a
4n3s2e
4n3s2i
4n3s2í
4n3s2o
4n3s2ô
4n3s2u
4o1i2u
4o2i.
4o2i1a
4o2i1á
4o2i1â
4o2i1ã
4o2i1e
4o2i1é
4o2i1ê
4o2i1i
4o2i1o
4o2i1ó
4o2i1ô
4o2i3ú
4p3s2
4r.
4r5r2
4s.
4s3s2
5ç2
6e1o2i3d4e
6e1o2i3d4i
6e1o2i3s4o
6e1o2i3s4ô
6e1o3í
6e1o3i2m5
6e1o3i2n5
6e1o3i3l2
6e1o3i5f2
6e1o3j2
6e1o3l2
6e1o3m2
6e1o3o2s5
6e1o3o5f2
6e1o3o5l2
6e1o3p2
6e1o3q4
6e1o4i3p2
6e1o4m.
6e1o4n.
6e1o4r3b2
6e1o4r3d2
6e1o4r3e2
6e1o4r3g2
6e1o4r3n2
6e1o4r3q2
6e1o4r3r2
6e1o4r3t2
6e1o4s3c2
6e1o4s3f2
6e1o4s3m2
6e1o4s3p2
6e1o4s3q2
6e1o4s3s2
6e1o4s3t2
6e1o5i3d4r2
6e3o1i4s3t
6n4s3b2
6n4s3c2
6n4s3d2
6n4s3f2
6n4s3g2
6n4s3j2
6n4s3l2
6n4s3m2
6n4s3n2
6n4s3p2
6n4s3r2
6n4s3s2
6n4s3t2
6n4s3v2
6o1i2n4s3
6o1i2r3r4
6o1i2s3m4
6o1i2s3q4
6o1i2s3s4
6o1i2s3t4
6o1i3n4h2
6o1i4m3b2
6o1i4m3p2
6o1i4n3c2
6o1i4n3d2
6o1i4n3f2
6o1i4n3g2
6o1i4n3j2
6o1i4n3q2
6o1i4n3t2
6o1i4n3v2
6o1i4r3m2
6o2i1p4
6o2i1q4
6o2i1r4a
6o2i1r4á
6o2i1r4ã
6o2i1r4e
6o2i1r4é
6o2i1r4i
6o2i1r4í
6o2i1r4o
6o2i1r4õ
6o2i1r4u
6o2i1s4a
6o2i1s4á
6o2i1s4ã
6o2i1s4e
6o2i1s4é
6o2i1s4i
6o2i1s4í
6o2i1s4o
6o2i1s4ó
6o2i1s4ô
6o2i1t4
6o2i1v4
6o2i1x4
6o2i1z4
6o4i1c2
6o4i1ç2
6o4i1d2
6o4i1f2
6o4i1g2
6o4i1j2
6o4i1l2
6o4i1m2a
6o4i1m2á
6o4i1m2e
6o4i1m2é
6o4i1m2ê
6o4i1m2i
6o4i1m2o
6o4i1m2u
6o4i1n2a
6o4i1n2e
6o4i1n2i
6o4i1n2í
6o4i1n2o
6o4i1n2ó
6o4i1n2ô
6o4i1n2u
6o4i3b2
a1c2a
a1c2á
a1c2â
a1c2ã
á1c2a
a1c2e
a1c2é
a1c2ê
á1c2e
a1c2i
a1c2í
á1c2i
a1c2o
a1c2ó
a1c2ô
á1c2o
a1c2õ4
a1c2u
a1c2ú
á1c2u
a1c2y
a1c4h2
á1c4h2
a1c4l2
á1c4l2
a1c4r2
á1c4r2
a1c4s2
a1d2a
a1d2á
a1d2â
a1d2ã
a1d2e
a1d2é
a1d2ê
a1d2i
a1d2í
a1d2o
a1d2ó
a1d2ô
a1d2u
a1d2ú
a1d2y
a1d4r2
a1é
a1e2s.
a1e2s3c4
a1e2s3f4
a1e2s3p4
a1e2s3t4
a1e2u3p
a1e2u3r
a1e3í5d
a1e3s2e
a1e3s2i
a1e3s2o
a1e3s2ô
a1e4m.
a1e4n6s.
a1e5í2s3
a1e5p4
a1e5r4
a1e5t4
a1e5v4
a1e5x4
a1e5z4
a1í
a1l2a
a1l2á
a1l2â
a1l2ã
á1l2a
a1l2e
a1l2é
a1l2ê
á1l2e
a1l2i
a1l2í
á1l2i
a1l2o
a1l2ó
a1l2ô
á1l2o
a1l2õ2
a1l2u
a1l2ú
á1l2u
a1l2y
a1l4h2
á1l4h2
a1m2a
a1m2á
a1m2â
a1m2ã
a1m2e
a1m2é
a1m2ê
a1m2i
a1m2í
a1m2o
a1m2ó
a1m2ô
a1m2õ
a1m2u
a1m2ú
a1m2y
a1n2a
a1n2á
a1n2â
a1n2ã
a1n2e
a1n2é
a1n2ê
a1n2i
a1n2í
a1n2o
a1n2ó
a1n2ô
a1n2õ4
a1n2u
a1n2ú
a1n2y
a1n4h2
a1ó2r3t
a1ó2s3p
a1ó2s3s
a1ó3c
a1ó3d
a1ó3f
a1ó3l
a1ó3t
á1r2a
á1r2e
á1r2i
á1r2o
á1r2u
a1ra
a1rá
a1rã
a1re
a1ré
a1rê
a1ri
a1rí
a1ro
a1ró
a1rô
a1rõ
a1ru
a1rú
a1s2a
a1s2á
a1s2â
a1s2ã
á1s2a
a1s2é
a1s2ê
á1s2e
a1s2h2
a1s2i
a1s2í
á1s2i
a1s2o
a1s2ó
a1s2ô
á1s2o
a1s2õ4
a1s2u
a1s2ú
á1s2u
a1ú
a1x2a
a1x2á
a1x2â
a1x2ã
á1x2a
a1x2e
a1x2é
a1x2ê
á1x2e
a1x2i
a1x2í
á1x2i
a1x2o
a1x2ó
a1x2ô
á1x2o
a1x2u
a1x2ú
ã1z
a1z2a
a1z2á
a1z2â
a1z2ã
á1z2a
a1z2e
a1z2é
a1z2ê
á1z2e
a1z2i
a1z2í
á1z2i
a1z2o
a1z2ó
a1z2ô
a1z2õ4
a1z2u
a1z2ú
á1z2u
a2b3b2
a2b3c2
a2b3d2
á2b3d2
a2b3f2
a2b3g2
a2b3j2
a2b3m2
a2b3n2
a2b3p2
a2b3s2a
a2b3s2e
a2b3s2ê
a2b3s2i
a2b3s2í
á2b3s2i
a2b3s2o
á2b3s2o
a2b3s2u
á2b3s2u
a2b3v2
a2b3z2
a2b4s3b2
a2b4s3c2
a2b4s3s2
a2b4s3t2
á2b4s3t2
a2c1b
a2c1c4
a2c1ç4
a2c1d4
a2c1f4
a2c1g4
a2c1k4
a2c1m2
á2c1m2
á2c1n2
a2c1n4
a2c1p2
a2c1q4
á2c1t2
a2c1t4
a2d1b2
a2d1c2
a2d1d2
a2d1f2
a2d1g2
a2d1h2
a2d1j2
a2d1l2
a2d1m2
a2d1n2
a2d1p2
a2d1q4
a2d1s2
a2d1t2
a2d1v2
a2d1z2
ã2e
a2e1u2m
a2e1u2n
a2e4a
a2e4f3f
a2f3c2
a2f3f2
a2f3g2
a2f3k2
a2f3n2
á2f3n2
a2f3s2
a2f3t2
á2f3t2
a2f3v2
a2f3z2
a2g3b2
a2g3d2
á2g3d2
a2g3f2
a2g3g2
a2g3h2
a2g3m2
á2g3m2
a2g3n2
á2g3n2
á2g4s.
a2h3c2
a2h3d2
a2h3l2
a2h3m2
a2h3n2
a2h3r2
a2i
á2i1
a2j3m2
a2j3p2
a2j3r2
a2k3b2
a2k3j2
a2l1b2
á2l1b2
a2l1c2
a2l1ç2
á2l1c2
a2l1d2
á2l1d2
a2l1f2
á2l1f2
a2l1g2
á2l1g2
a2l1j2
a2l1l2
á2l1l2
a2l1m2
á2l1m2
a2l1n2
á2l1n2
a2l1p2
á2l1p2
a2l1q2
á2l1q4
a2l1r2
á2l1r2
a2l1s2
á2l1s2
a2l1t2
á2l1t2
a2l1v2
á2l1v2
a2l1x2
a2l1z2
a2m1b2
a2m1d2
a2m1h2
a2m1l2
a2m1m2
a2m1n2
a2m1p2
a2m1q4
a2m1r2
a2m1s2
a2m1t2
a2m1z2
a2n1b2
a2n1c2
a2n1ç2
a2n1d2
a2n1f2
a2n1g2
a2n1j2
a2n1k2
a2n1l2
a2n1m2
a2n1n2
a2n1p2
a2n1q4
a2n1r2
a2n1s2a
a2n1s2á
a2n1s2ã
a2n1s2e
a2n1s2é
a2n1s2i
a2n1s2í
a2n1s2o
a2n1s2ó
a2n1s2ô
a2n1s2u
a2n1t2
a2n1v2
a2n1x2
a2n1z2
a2n4s.
a2n4s1b2
a2n4s1c2
a2n4s1d2
a2n4s1f2
a2n4s1g2
a2n4s1j2
a2n4s1l2
a2n4s1m2
a2n4s1n2
a2n4s1p2
a2n4s1q4
a2n4s1r2
a2n4s1s2
a2n4s1t2
a2n4s1v2
a2o
a2r.
á2r1b2
á2r1c2
á2r1d2
á2r1f2
á2r1g2
á2r1j2
á2r1l2
á2r1m2
á2r1n2
á2r1p2
á2r1q4
á2r1r2
á2r1s2
á2r1t2
á2r1v2
á2r1x2
á2r1z2
a2s1b2
a2s1c2
á2s1c2
a2s1d2
a2s1e2
a2s1f2
á2s1f2
a2s1g2
á2s1g2
a2s1l
a2s1m2
á2s1m2
a2s1n2
á2s1n2
a2s1p2
á2s1p2
a2s1q4
á2s1q4
a2s1r2
á2s1r2
a2s1t2
á2s1t2
a2s1v2
a2s1z2
á2s1z2
a2s3s2
á2s3s2
a2t3c2
a2t3f2
a2t3m2
á2t3m2
a2t3n2
á2t3n2
a2t3p2
a2t3s2
á2t3s2
a2t3t2
á2t3t2
a2t3v2
a2t3z2
a2u
á2u
a2v3c2
a2v3s2
a2x1c2
a2x1m2
a2x1t2
a2x1w
a2z1d2
a2z1l2
a2z1m2
a2z1q4
a2z1t2
a2z1z2
a3a
a3á
a3b2a
a3b2á
a3b2â
a3b2ã
á3b2a
á3b2ã
a3b2e
a3b2é
a3b2ê
á3b2e
á3b2ê
a3b2i
a3b2í
á3b2i
a3b2o
a3b2ó
a3b2ô
a3b2õ
á3b2o
a3b2u
a3b2ú
á3b2u
a3b4l2
á3b4l2
a3b4r2
á3b4r2
á3d2
a3e1c2o
a3e1d2á
a3e1d2e
a3e1d2í
a3e1d2o
a3e1d4r2
a3e1e2
a3e1f2e
a3e1f2u
a3e1í5n
a3e1l2a
a3e1l2á
a3e1l2â
a3e1l2e
a3e1l2é
a3e1l2h4
a3e1l2i
a3e1l2í
a3e1l2o
a3e1l3l4
a3e1m2i
a3e1m2o
a3e1o2
a3e2i1
a3e2l.
a3e2m5b4
a3e2m5p4
a3f2a
a3f2á
a3f2â
a3f2ã
á3f2a
a3f2e
a3f2é
a3f2ê
á3f2e
a3f2i
a3f2í
á3f2i
a3f2o
a3f2ó
a3f2ô
á3f2o
a3f2õ4
a3f2u
a3f2ú
a3f4l2
a3f4r2
á3f4r2
a3g2a
a3g2á
a3g2â
a3g2ã
á3g2a
a3g2e
a3g2é
a3g2ê
á3g2e
a3g2i
a3g2í
á3g2i
a3g2o
a3g2ó
a3g2ô
á3g2o
a3g2õ4
a3g2u
a3g2ú
á3g2u
a3g2y
a3g4l2
á3g4l2
a3g4r2
á3g4r2
a3h2a
a3h2e
a3h2i
a3h2o
a3h2ô
a3h2u
a3j2a
a3j2á
a3j2â
a3j2ã
a3j2e
a3j2é
a3j2i
a3j2í
a3j2o
a3j2ó
a3j2ô
a3j2õ4
a3j2u
a3j2ú
a3k2a
a3k2e
a3ôs.
a3p2
á3p2
a3q4
á3q4
a3r4é2n4s
a3t2a
a3t2á
a3t2â
a3t2ã
á3t2a
a3t2e
a3t2é
a3t2ê
á3t2e
a3t2h2
a3t2i
a3t2í
á3t2i
a3t2o
a3t2ó
a3t2ô
á3t2o
a3t2õ4
a3t2u
a3t2ú
á3t2u
a3t2y
a3t4l2
á3t4l2
a3t4r2
á3t4r2
á3v2
a3v2a
a3v2á
a3v2â
a3v2ã
a3v2e
a3v2é
a3v2ê
a3v2i
a3v2í
a3v2l2
a3v2o
a3v2ó
a3v2ô
a3v2õ
a3v2u
a3v2ú
a3v4r2
a4e3c2a
a4e3c2e
a4e3c2í
a4e3g2
a4m.
ã4o
a4s.
á4s.
a4x.
á4x.
a4z.
á4z.
a6l.
ar1b2
ar1c2
ar1d2
ar1f2
ar1g2
ar1j2
ar1l2
ar1m2
ar1n2
ar1p2
ar1q4
ar1r2
ar1s2
ar1t2
ar1v2
ar1x2
ar1z2
b2ó
b3d2é1n2
b4o5i6a
c1q
c4r2é3n2
d2l
e1á
e1ã
é1a
e1c2a
e1c2á
e1c2â
e1c2ã
é1c2a
e1c2e
e1c2é
e1c2ê
é1c2e
e1c2i
e1c2í
é1c2i
e1c2o
e1c2ó
e1c2ô
é1c2o
e1c2õ4
e1c2u
e1c2ú
é1c2u
e1c4h2
é1c4h2
e1c4l2
é1c4l2
e1c4r2
é1c4r2
e1e2m.
e1e2n6s.
e1í
e1l2a
e1l2á
e1l2â
e1l2ã
é1l2a
e1l2é
e1l2ê
é1l2e
e1l2i
e1l2í
é1l2i
e1l2o
e1l2ó
e1l2ô
e1l2õ
é1l2o
e1l2u
e1l2ú
é1l2u
e1l2y
e1l4h2
e1m2a
e1m2á
e1m2â
e1m2ã
é1m2a
ê1m2a
e1m2e
e1m2é
e1m2ê
é1m2e
ê1m2e
e1m2i
e1m2í
é1m2i
ê1m2i
e1m2o
e1m2ó
e1m2ô
é1m2o
ê1m2o
e1m2u
e1m2ú
é1m2u
ê1m2u
e1n2a
e1n2á
e1n2â
e1n2ã
ê1n2a
e1n2e
e1n2é
e1n2ê
ê1n2e
e1n2i
e1n2í
ê1n2i
e1n2o
e1n2ó
e1n2ô
ê1n2o
e1n2u
e1n2ú
ê1n2u
e1n2y
